Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 5 METROPOLITAN SEWAGE DISPOSAL DISTRICTS
32-4-529. Covenants in security proceedings.

Any resolution or trust indenture authorizing the issuance of securities or any other instrument appertaining thereto may contain covenants and other provisions, notwithstanding such covenants and provisions may limit the exercise of powers conferred by this part 5, in order to secure the payment of such securities, in agreement with the holders and owners of such securities, as to any one or more of the following:

The service charges, and any general taxes to be fixed, charged, or levied, and the collection, use, and disposition thereof, including but not limited to the foreclosure of liens for delinquencies, the discontinuance of services, facilities, or commodities, or use of any sewage disposal system or project, prohibition against free service, the collection of penalties and collection costs, including disconnection and reconnection fees, and the use and disposition of any revenues of the district derived, or to be derived, from any source;

The acquisition, improvement, or equipment of all or any part of the sewage disposal system or of any project;

The creation and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any securities or of operation and maintenance expenses of any sewage disposal system or any project, or part thereof, and the source, custody, security, use, and disposition of any such reserves or funds, including but not limited to the powers and duties of any trustee with regard thereto;

A fair and reasonable payment by the district from its general fund or other available moneys to the account of a designated project for any facilities or commodities furnished or services rendered thereby to the district or any of its departments, boards, or agencies;

The purpose to which the proceeds of the sale of securities may be applied, and the custody, security, use, expenditure, application, and disposition thereof;

The payment of the principal of and interest on any securities, and the sources and methods thereof, the rank or priority of any securities as to any lien or security for payment, or the acceleration of any maturity of any securities, or the issuance of other or additional securities payable from or constituting a charge against or lien upon any revenues pledged for the payment of securities and the creation of future liens and encumbrances there against, and limitations thereon;

The use, regulation, inspection, management, operation, maintenance, or disposition, or any limitation or regulation of the use, of all or any part of the sewage disposal system or any facilities or project;

The determination or definition of revenues from the sewage disposal system or any project or of the expenses of operation and maintenance of such system or project, the use and disposition of such revenues and the manner of and limitations upon paying such expenses;

The insurance to be carried by the district and use and disposition of insurance moneys, the acquisition of completion or surety bonds appertaining to any project or funds, or both, and the use and disposition of any proceeds of such bonds;

Books of account, the inspection and audit thereof, and other records appertaining to a sewage disposal system, sewer system, or any project authorized in this part 5;

The assumption or payment or discharge of any indebtedness, other obligation, lien, or other claim relating to any part of a sewage disposal system or of any project or any securities having or which may have a lien on any part of any revenues of the district;

Limitations on the powers of the district to acquire or operate, or permit the acquisition or operation of, any plants, structures, facilities, or properties which may compete or tend to compete with the sewage disposal system or any project;

The vesting in a corporate or other trustee such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the district may determine, which may include any of the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee appointed by the holders of securities, and limiting or abrogating the right of such holders to appoint a trustee, or limiting the rights, duties, and powers of such trustee;

The payment of costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the securities or of the provisions of the resolution or of any covenant or contract with the holders of the securities;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any covenant or contract with, or duty to, the holders of securities may be amended or abrogated, the amount of securities the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given or evidenced;

Events of default, rights, and liabilities arising therefrom, and the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by the district of any covenants, conditions, or obligations;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the securities, or any portion, percentage, or amount of them, may enforce any covenants or provisions made under this part 5, or duties imposed thereby;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the securities, or of a specified portion, percentage, or amount thereof, or any trustee therefor, shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of the sewage disposal system or any project or service, operate and maintain the same, prescribe fees, rates, and charges, and collect, receive, and apply all revenues thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the district itself might do;

A procedure by which the terms of any resolution authorizing securities, or any other contract with any holders of securities, including but not limited to an indenture of trust or similar instrument, may be amended or abrogated, and as to the amount of securities the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

The terms and conditions upon which any or all of the securities become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

All such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure the district's securities, or, in the discretion of the board, tend to make the securities more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenant, act, or thing may not be enumerated in this part 5, it being the intention hereof to give a district power to do all things in the issuance of securities and for their security, except as specifically limited in this part 5.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 211, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-28.

32-4-530. Remedies of security holders.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue or series of securities, or trustee therefor, including but not limited to the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion, percentage, or number of such holders, and subject to any prior or superior rights of others, any holder of securities, or trustee therefor, has the right, for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of securities similarly situated:

By mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity to enforce his rights against the district and its board and any of its officers, agents, and employees, and to require and compel the district or its board or any such officers, agents, or employees to perform and carry out their duties, obligations, or other commitments under this part 5 and their covenants and agreements with the holder of any security;

By action or suit in equity to require the district and its board to account as if they were the trustee of an express trust;

By action or suit in equity to have appointed a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of any system, project, or services, revenues from which are pledged for the payment of the securities, prescribe sufficient fees derived from the operation thereof, and collect, receive, and apply all revenues or other moneys pledged for the payment of the securities in the same manner as the district itself might do in accordance with the obligations of the district;

By action or suit in equity enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holder of any security, and bring suit thereupon.

If a resolution of a district authorizing or providing for the issuance of the securities of any series or any proceedings appertaining thereto contains a provision authorized by section 32-4-529 (1)(r) and shall further provide in substance that any trustee appointed pursuant to said section shall have the powers provided by that section, then such trustee, whether or not all of the bonds of such series have been declared due and payable, shall be entitled as of right to the appointment of a receiver of the sewage disposal system, and such receiver may enter upon and take possession of the sewage disposal system and, subject to any pledge or contract with the holders of such securities, shall take possession of all moneys and other property derived from or applicable to the acquisition, operation, maintenance, or improvement of the sewage disposal system and proceed with such acquisition, operation, maintenance, or improvement which the district is under any obligation to do, and operate, maintain, equip, and improve the sewage disposal system, and fix, charge, collect, enforce, and receive the service charges and all systems revenues thereafter arising, subject to any pledge thereof or contract with the holders of such securities relating thereto, and perform the public duties and carry out the contracts and obligations of the district in the same manner as the district itself might do and under the direction of the court.

Neither the members of the board of directors of a district nor any person executing securities issued pursuant to this part 5 shall be liable personally on the securities by reason of the issuance thereof. Securities issued pursuant to this part 5 shall not be in any way a debt or liability of the state or of any municipality or other public body and shall not create or constitute any indebtedness, liability, or obligation of the state or of any such municipality or other public body, either legal, moral, or otherwise, and nothing in this part 5 contained shall be construed to authorize any district to incur any indebtedness on behalf of, or in any way to obligate, the state or any municipality or other public body, except the district, and except as in this part 5 otherwise expressly stated or necessarily implied.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 214, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-29.

32-4-531. Cancellation of paid securities.

Whenever the treasurer of the district redeems and pays any of the securities issued under the provisions of this part 5, he shall cancel the same by writing across the face thereof or stamping thereon the word "Paid", together with the date of the payment, sign his name thereto, and transmit the same to the secretary of the district, taking his receipt therefor, which receipt shall be filed in the records of the district. The secretary shall credit the treasurer on his books for the amount so paid.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 216, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-30.

32-4-532. Interest after maturity.

No interest shall accrue on any security authorized in this part 5 after it becomes due and payable if funds for the payment of the principal of and interest on the security and any prior redemption premium due are available to the paying agent for such payment without default.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 216, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-31.

32-4-533. Refunding bonds.

Any bonds issued under this part 5 may be refunded, without an election, pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board in the manner provided in this part 5 for the issuance of other securities, subject to any contractual limitations, to refund, pay, or discharge all or any part of the district's outstanding bonds, including any interest thereon in arrears or about to become due, or for the purpose of reducing interest costs or effecting other economies or of modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations appertaining to the issuance of additional bonds for any sewage disposal system or project.

Any bonds issued for refunding purposes may either be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds authorized to be refunded or may be sold as provided in this part 5 for the sale of other bonds.

No bonds may be refunded under this part 5 unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds, or unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment. No maturity of any bonds refunded may be extended over fifteen years. The rate of interest on such refunding bonds shall be determined by the board. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may exceed the principal amount of the refunded bonds if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding bonds do not exceed such unaccrued costs of the bonds refunded.

The proceeds of refunding bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the bonds to be refunded or be placed in escrow to be applied to the payment of the bonds upon their presentation therefor. Any escrowed proceeds, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such escrowed proceeds and investments, together with any interest to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient to pay the bonds refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or due at prior redemption dates as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent payable therefrom.

Refunding revenue bonds may be made payable from any revenues derived from the operation of any sewage disposal system or project, or any other source, notwithstanding that the pledge of such revenues for the payment of the outstanding bonds issued by the district which are to be refunded is thereby modified.

Bonds for refunding and bonds for any other purpose authorized in this part 5 may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more.

Except as in this section specifically provided or necessarily implied, the relevant provisions in this part 5 pertaining to bonds shall be equally applicable in the authorization and issuance of refunding bonds, including their terms and security, the bond resolution, trust indenture, taxes, and service charges, and other aspects of the bonds.

The determination of the board that the limitations under this part 5 imposed upon the issuance of refunding bonds have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 216, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-32.

L. 70:

p. 288, § 91.

L. 89:

(4) amended, p. 1118, § 38, effective July 1.

32-4-534. Cumulative rights of security holders.

No right or remedy conferred upon any holder of any security or any coupon appertaining thereto or any trustee for such holder, by this part 5 or by any proceedings appertaining to the issuance of such security or coupon, is exclusive of any other right or remedy, but each such right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this part 5 or by any other law.

The failure of any holder of any security or coupon so to proceed as provided in this part 5 or in such proceedings shall not relieve the district, its board, or any of its officers, agents, and employees of any liability for failure to perform or carry out any duty, obligation, or other commitment.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 217, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-33.

32-4-535. Issuance of notes and pledge of bonds as collateral security.

Notwithstanding any limitation or other provision in this part 5, whenever a proposal to issue bonds has been approved and the district authorized to issue bonds in the manner required by this part 5 for any purpose authorized in this part 5, the district is authorized to borrow money without any other election in anticipation of taxes, the receipt of the proceeds of said bonds or any other revenues of the district, or any combination thereof, and to issue notes to evidence the amount so borrowed. Notes may mature at such times not exceeding a period of time equal to the estimated time needed to effect the purposes for which the bonds are so authorized to be issued, plus two years, as the board may determine. Except as otherwise provided in this section, notes shall be issued as provided in this part 5 for securities in sections 32-4-524 to 32-4-532 and section 32-4-534. Taxes, other revenues of the district, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, proceeds of bonds to be thereafter issued or reissued, or bonds issued for the purpose of securing the payment of notes, may be pledged for the purpose of securing the payment of the notes.

Any bonds pledged as collateral security for the payment of any notes shall mature at such times as the board may determine but in no event exceeding forty years from the date of either any of such bonds or any of such notes, whichever date is earlier. Any such bonds pledged as collateral security shall not be issued in an aggregate principal amount exceeding the aggregate principal amount of the note secured by a pledge of such bonds, nor shall they bear interest at any time which, with any interest accruing at the same time on the note so secured, exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate approved at the election held to authorize the issuance of said bonds under this part 5.

No note issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be extended or funded except by the issuance or reissuance of a bond in compliance with subsection (3) of this section.

For the purpose of funding any note, any bond pledged as collateral security to secure the payment of such note may be reissued without an election, and any bonds not previously issued but authorized to be issued at an election for a purpose the same as or encompassing the purpose for which the notes were issued may be issued for such a funding. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any bond to be issued for the purpose of funding any note by a district that qualifies as an enterprise in accordance with section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution may be issued without an election. Any such bonds shall mature at such times as the board may determine but in no event exceeding forty years from the date of either any of the notes so funded or any of the bonds so pledged as collateral security, whichever date is the earlier. Bonds for funding, including but not necessarily limited to any such reissued bonds, and bonds for any other purpose authorized in this part 5, may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any such funding bonds shall be issued as is provided for refunding bonds in subsections (1), (2), (4), (5), (7), and (8) of section 32-4-533 and provided for securities in sections 32-4-524 to 32-4-532 and section 32-4-534.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 218, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-34.

L. 70:

p. 288, § 92.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 46, § 2, effective August 7.

32-4-536. Connections with existing drains and pumping stations.

In order to carry out and effectuate its purposes, every district is authorized to enter upon and use and connect with any existing public drains, sewers, conduits, pipe lines, pumping and ventilating stations, and treatment plants or works, or any other public property of a similar nature within the district, and, if deemed necessary by the district, close off and seal outlets and outfalls therefrom. No district shall, in the absence of a contract so authorizing take permanent possession or make permanent use of any such treatment plant or works unless it acquires the same as provided in this part 5.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 219, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-35.

32-4-537. Connections with drains serving property - service charges.

Each municipality within the district, and every person owning or operating any sewer or drain or any system of water distribution serving three or more parcels of real property in the district, shall at the request of the district, make available to the district any of its maps, plans, specifications, records, books, accounts, or other data or things deemed necessary by the district for its purposes.

Each municipality shall promptly pay to any district all service charges which the district may charge to it, and shall provide for the payment thereof in the same manner as other obligations of such municipality. Except to the extent the proceeds of general ad valorem taxes and other revenues are made available, each municipality shall fix and collect service charges in connection with its sewer system sufficient in amount to produce revenues annually to pay the service charges levied by the district and all other claims to be defrayed therewith, as provided in section 32-4-522.

Each person owning or operating any sewer or drain which serves three or more parcels of real property in a municipality in the district and which discharges sewage into waters in or bordering the state shall, upon notice from the municipality of its availability and a proposed point of connection with the sewer system of the municipality, cause such sewer or drain to be connected with the system at such point and in such manner as the municipality may specify and shall thereafter cause said sewer or drain to discharge into the sewer system.

Each municipality and any person owning or operating any system of water distribution serving three or more parcels of real property in the district shall, from time to time after request therefor by the district, deliver to the district copies of the records made by it in the regular course of business of the amount of water supplied by it to every such parcel of real property in the district. Such copies shall be delivered to the district within sixty days after the making of such records, and the district shall pay the reasonable cost of preparation and delivery of such copies.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 219, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-36.

32-4-538. Construction of other sewage disposal systems prohibited.

It is hereby declared that a district shall be the exclusive agency for the acquisition and operation of a sewage disposal system within a district, except as in this part 5 otherwise provided or authorized, and that no sewage disposal system or other facility for the collection, treatment, or disposal of sewage arising within a district, including any sewage treatment or disposal facilities of a municipality, shall be acquired or improved after a district is organized, unless the district gives its consent thereto and approves the plans and specifications therefor, except for any acquisition or improvement of any sewer collection facilities or sewer system, but not sewage treatment or disposal facility or sewage disposal system, or any part thereof, owned by a municipality at any point above the connection of such collection facilities or sewer system with any sewage disposal system or other project of the district. Each district is empowered by this part 5 to give such consent and approval, subject to the terms and provisions of any agreement with any holder of securities.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 220, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-37.

32-4-539. Publication of resolution or proceedings - effect - right to contest legality - time limitation.

In its discretion the board may provide for the publication once in full of any resolution or other proceedings adopted by the board ordering the issuance of any securities or, in the alternative, publication of notice, which resolution, other proceedings, or notice so published shall state the fact and date of such adoption and the place where such resolution or other proceedings has been filed for public inspection and also the date of the first publication of such resolution, other proceedings, or notice, and also state that any action or proceeding of any kind in any court questioning the validity of the creation and establishment of the district, or the validity or proper authorization of securities provided for by the resolution or other proceedings, or the validity of any covenants, agreements, or contracts provided for by the resolution or other proceedings, shall be commenced within twenty days after the first publication of such resolution, other proceedings, or notice.

If no such action or proceedings is commenced within twenty days after the first publication of such resolution, other proceedings, or notice, then all residents and taxpayers and owners of property in the district and users of the sewage disposal system and all public bodies and all other persons whomsoever shall be forever barred and foreclosed from commencing any action or proceeding in any court, or from pleading any defense to any action or proceedings, questioning the validity of the establishment of the district, the validity or proper authorization of such securities, or the validity of any such covenants, agreements, or contracts, and said securities, covenants, agreements, and contracts shall be conclusively deemed to be valid and binding obligations in accordance with their terms and tenor.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 220, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-39.

32-4-540. Confirmation of contract proceedings.

In its discretion, the board may file a petition at any time in the district court in and for any county in which the district is located wholly or in part, praying for a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred or of any tax or rates or charges levied, or of any act, proceeding, or contract of the district, whether or not said contract has been executed, including proposed contracts for the acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, operation, or disposal of any project for the district. Such petition shall set forth the facts whereon the validity of such power, assessment, act, proceeding, or contract is founded and shall be verified by the chairman of the board.

Such action shall be in the nature of a proceeding in rem, and jurisdiction of all parties interested may be had by publication and posting, as provided in this part 5. Notice of the filing of said petition shall be given by the clerk of the court, under the seal thereof, stating in brief outline the contents of the petition and showing where a full copy of any contract therein mentioned, may be examined. The notice shall be served by publication in at least five consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the principal office of the district is located, and by posting the same in the office of the district at least thirty days prior to the date fixed in said notice for the hearing on said petition. Jurisdiction shall be complete after such publication and posting.

Any owner of property in the district or person interested in the contract or proposed contract or in the premises may appear and move to dismiss or answer said petition at any time prior to the date fixed for said hearing or within such further time as may be allowed by the court; and the petition shall be taken as confessed by all persons who fail to appear.

The petition and notice shall be sufficient to give the court jurisdiction and upon hearing, the court shall examine into and determine all matters and things affecting the question submitted, shall make such findings with reference thereto, and render such judgment and decree thereon as the case warrants. Costs may be divided or apportioned among any contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court. Review of the judgment of the court may be had as in other similar cases, except that such review must be applied for within thirty days after the time of the rendition of such judgment, or within such additional time as may be allowed by the court within thirty days. The Colorado rules of civil procedure shall govern in matters of pleading and practice where not otherwise specified in this part 5. The court shall disregard any error, irregularity, or omission which does not affect the substantial right of the parties.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 221, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-40.

32-4-541. Preliminary expenses.

The district may provide for the payment of all necessary preliminary expenses actually incurred in the making of surveys, estimates of costs and revenues, the employment of engineers, architects, fiscal agents, attorneys at law, clerical help, other agents or employees, the making of notices, taking of options, and all other expenses necessary or desirable to be made and paid prior to the authorization for or the issuance of such securities, and any other cost of any project.

No such expenditures shall be made or paid unless an appropriation has been budgeted and made therefor in the same manner as is required by law, or unless the proceeds of securities or other moneys are available to defray such expenses.

Any funds so expended by the district for preliminary expenses incurred in connection with the same purpose as that for which securities are issued may be fully reimbursed and repaid to the district out of the proceeds derived from the sale of such securities.

The amount so advanced by the district to pay such preliminary expenses may, by a resolution authorizing the issuance of such securities, be made a first charge against such security proceeds until the same has been repaid as provided in this part 5, and in such event said amount shall be paid therewith before any other disbursements are made therefrom.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 222, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-41.

32-4-542. Tax exemption.

The effectuation of the powers authorized in this part 5 shall be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, including, but not necessarily limited to, those residing in any district exercising any power under this part 5, for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and for the increase of their commerce and prosperity.

No district exercising any power granted in this part 5 shall be required to pay any general ad valorem taxes upon any property appertaining to any project authorized in this part 5 and acquired within the state, nor the district's interest therein.

Securities issued under this part 5 and the income therefrom shall forever remain free and exempt from taxation by the state, the district, and any other public body, except transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 223, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-42.

32-4-543. Freedom from judicial process.

Execution or other judicial process shall not issue against any property in this part 5 authorized of the district nor shall any judgment against the district be a charge or lien upon its property.

This section does not apply to or limit the right of the holder of any security, his trustee, or any assignee of all or part of his interest, the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the district, or any other obligee under this part 5 to foreclose, otherwise to enforce, and to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by the district on the proceeds of taxes, service charges, or other revenues.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 223, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-43.

32-4-544. Legal investments in securities.

It shall be legal for any bank, trust company, banker, savings bank, or banking institution; any building and loan association, savings and loan association, or investment company; any other person carrying on a banking or investment business; any insurance company, insurance association, or other person carrying on an insurance business; and any executor, administrator, curator, trustee, or other fiduciary to invest funds or moneys in their custody in any of the securities authorized to be issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 5. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such securities shall be authorized security for all public deposits. Nothing in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any public body or other person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 223, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-44.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 71, effective July 1.

32-4-545. Misdemeanors and civil rights.

Any person who wrongfully or purposely fills up, cuts, damages, injures, or destroys, or in any manner impairs, the usefulness of any reservoir, canal, ditch, lateral, drain, dam, intercepting sewer, outfall sewer, force main, other sewer, sewage treatment works, sewage treatment plant, sewer system, sewage disposal system, or any part thereof, or other work, structure, improvement, equipment, or other property acquired under the provisions of this part 5, or wrongfully and maliciously interferes with any officer, agent, or employee of the district in the proper discharge of the officer's, agent's, or employee's duties, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

The district damaged by any such act may also bring a civil action for damages sustained by any such act, and in such proceeding the prevailing party shall also be entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs of court.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 224, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-45.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3257, § 546, effective March 1, 2022.

32-4-546. Validation.

All securities issued or purportedly issued and other contracts executed or purportedly executed of districts prior to February 21, 1962, all district bond elections held and carried, or purportedly held and carried prior to that date, and all acts and proceedings had or taken, or purportedly had or taken, by or on behalf of districts under law or under color of law prior to that date, preliminary to and in the creation and any reorganization of each such district, or the modification of its corporate boundaries, the designation and qualification of directors, officers, employees, and other agents of each such district, the authorization, execution, sale, and issuance of all securities, the authorization and execution of all other contracts, and the exercise of other powers in the metropolitan sewage disposal district law, are validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, except as provided in section 32-4-547, notwithstanding any lack of power, authority, or otherwise, other than constitutional, and notwithstanding any defects and irregularities, other than constitutional, in such securities, acts, and proceedings, in such authorization, execution, sale, and issuance, and in such exercise of powers; and such securities and other contracts are and shall be binding, legal, valid and enforceable obligations of the district to which they appertain in accordance with their terms and their authorization proceedings.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 224, § 15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-46.

32-4-547. Effect of and limitations upon validation.

This part 5 shall operate to supply such legislative authority as may be necessary to validate any securities issued, other contracts executed by districts, and any acts and proceedings taken prior to February 12, 1962, appertaining to the issuance of securities or execution of other contracts by districts or otherwise, which the legislature could have supplied or provided for in the law under which such securities were issued, or such other contracts were executed and such acts or proceedings were taken; but this part 5 shall be limited to the validation of securities, other contracts, acts, and proceedings to the extent to which the same can be effectuated under the state and federal constitutions. This part 5, shall not operate to validate, ratify, approve, confirm, or legalize any bond or other security, other contract, act, proceedings, or other matter the legality of which is being contested or inquired into in any legal proceedings pending and undetermined on February 12, 1962, and shall not operate to confirm, validate, or legalize any bond or other security, other contract, act, proceedings, or other matter which has been determined in any legal proceedings to be illegal, void, or ineffective prior to February 12, 1962.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 224, § 16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-47.